Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4413
Financial impairment; compliance with order.

A risk retention group which is not chartered and licensed in this state and which is doing business in this state shall comply with a lawful order issued in a voluntary dissolution proceeding or in a delinquency proceeding commenced by the director or the commissioner of any other state if there has been a finding of financial impairment after an examination under section 44-4408.

Laws 1987, LB 514, § 13;

Laws 1991, LB 236, § 52.